Missouri, session 2026, HB9.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
There is appropriated out of the State Treasury, to be expended only as provided in
Article IV, Section 28 of the Constitution of Missouri, for the purpose of funding each
department, division, agency, fund transfer, and program described herein for the item or items
stated, and for no other purpose whatsoever, chargeable to the fund designated for the period
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, as follows:
Section 9.000. An appropriation may be comprised in whole or in part of
a one-time amount, and such one-time amount shall be construed
to be a component part of, and not in addition to, the stated
appropriation amount. Any amount of an appropriation identified
as “one-time” in this act shall not be considered an addition to
any ongoing core appropriation(s) in future fiscal periods beyond
June 30, 2026. Any amount identified as one-time may, however,
be requested in any future fiscal period as a new decision item.

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 2
Section 9.005. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,348,988
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................18,060
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 116,103
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................6,483,161
Personal Service ....................................................................................................87,021
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 1,800
From Inmate Fund (1540) .................................................................................................88,821
For Family Support Services
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (including $44,360 one-time) ..............................428,453
From Department of Corrections - Federal Fund (1130)
(including $44,360 one-time) ................................................................... 115,384
Total (Not to exceed 99.5 F.T.E.) ..............................................................................$7,115,819
Section 9.009. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For implementation of up to three modules for a new offender
management system on the statewide engagement platform;
matching funding to support analytics relating to probations,
parole, and recidivism; and analytics support for employee
recruitment and retention, provided the Department shall procure
services in compliance with Chapter 34, RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,300,000
Section 9.010. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of Professional Standards, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,040,513

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 3
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 250,252
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 51.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$3,290,765
Section 9.015. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For the Offender Reentry Program, provided three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,800,001
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ............................................................................................1,731,491
For a Kansas City Reentry Program
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................178,000
For a pay for performance agreement with private programs to reduce
the rate of recidivism which would reimburse such programs
based on a percentage of an amount on which the state benefited
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ...........................................................................2,500,000
For a pilot program to engage a nonprofit agency equipped to provide
video job interviewing with vetted second-chance employers,
onboarding assistance, and job coaching to inmates releasing
from state correctional facilities
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................750,000
For a pilot program to fund a re-entry navigator in at least ten Missouri
counties for the purpose of connecting recently released detainees
with appropriate re-entry resources
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .................................................................... 1,300,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$8,259,492
Section 9.016. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For funding a program for low-risk offender supervision that monitors
individuals subject to pre-conviction or post-conviction
supervision through a check-in system that the supervising
agency or circuit can access through a secure web-based

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 4
platform; a secondary objective is to establish exclusion zones
and compliance levels through a platform capable of generating
relevant reports
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,000,000
Section 9.020. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For receiving and expending grants, donations, contracts, and payments
from private, federal, and other governmental agencies which
may become available between sessions of the General
Assembly, provided the General Assembly shall be notified of
the source of any new funds and the purpose for which they
should be expended, in writing, prior to the use of said funds, and
provided sixty percent (60%) flexibility is allowed between
personal service and expense and equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,103,770
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 2,827,287
From Department of Corrections - Federal Fund (1130) (Not to exceed
43.00 F.T.E.) ....................................................................................................5,931,057
For contributions, gifts, and grants in support of a foster care dog
program to increase the adoptability of shelter animals and train
service dogs for the disabled
From State Institutions Gift Trust Fund (1925) ................................................... 75,000
Total ...........................................................................................................................$6,006,057
Section 9.025. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For Improving Community Treatment services, provided three percent
(3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$6,000,000
Section 9.030. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For costs associated with supervising the offender population
department-wide, including, but not limited to, funding for
personal service, expense and equipment, contractual services,
repairs, renovations, capital improvements, and compensatory

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 5
time, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,486,557
Section 9.035. To the Department of Corrections
For the Office of the Director
For restitution payments for those wrongly convicted, provided three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................$73,000
Section 9.040. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For telecommunications department-wide, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,860,529
Section 9.045. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$14,857,480
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 540,990
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 266.02 F.T.E.) ......................$15,398,470
Section 9.050. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For general services, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$744,318

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 6
Section 9.055. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For the operation of institutional facilities, utilities, systems furniture,
and structural modifications, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,881,365
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................... 1,425,607
Total .........................................................................................................................$28,306,972
Section 9.060. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For the purchase, transportation, and storage of food and food service
items, and operational expenses of food preparation facilities at
all correctional institutions, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed from personal service to expense
and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$3,525,150
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 44,410,473
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 77.00 F.T.E.) ........................$47,935,623
Section 9.065. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For training costs department-wide, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,898,340
Section 9.070. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For employee health and safety, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$584,964

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 7
Section 9.075. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Human Services
For overtime to state employees. Nonexempt state employees identified
by Section 105.935, RSMo, will be paid first with any remaining
funds being used to pay overtime to any other state employees,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285.
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,556,871
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................................60,962
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................... 60,962
Total .........................................................................................................................$13,678,795
Section 9.080. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For expenses and small equipment purchased at any of the adult
institutions department-wide, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$29,396,695
From Inmate Incarceration Reimbursement Act Revolving Fund (1828) ......................750,000
For expenses related to offender education, recreation, and/or religious
services
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 1,200,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$31,346,695
Section 9.085. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$4,282,462
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 132,896
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 67.91 F.T.E.) ..........................$4,415,358
Section 9.090. To the Department of Corrections

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 8
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For inmate wage and discharge costs at all correctional facilities,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$3,500,830
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 979,585
Total ...........................................................................................................................$4,480,415
Section 9.095. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Jefferson City Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$25,449,045
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ..............................................................193,244
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 186,991
Total (Not to exceed 508.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$25,829,280
Section 9.100. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Women’s Eastern Reception, Diagnostic and Correctional Center
at Vandalia, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between institutions and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,075,510
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................46,495
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) .................................................................................137,233
For a Prison Nursery Program provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed from personal service to expense and equipment and
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
institutions
Personal Service ..................................................................................................350,339
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 324,074
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ..............................................................................674,413

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 9
Expense and Equipment
From Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Federal Fund (1199) .............. 168,000
Total (Not to exceed 335.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,101,651
Section 9.105. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Ozark Correctional Center at Fordland, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,927,730
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 143,992
Total (Not to exceed 179.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$9,071,722
Section 9.110. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Moberly Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$18,752,963
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................85,665
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,654
Total (Not to exceed 380.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$18,981,282
Section 9.115. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Algoa Correctional Center at Jefferson City, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,703,988
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 135,264
Total (Not to exceed 278.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,839,252
Section 9.120. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 10
For the Missouri Eastern Correctional Center at Pacific, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$15,583,058
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 134,605
Total (Not to exceed 324.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$15,717,663
Section 9.125. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Chillicothe Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,346,269
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................46,495
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 138,407
Total (Not to exceed 410.02 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,531,171
Section 9.130. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Boonville Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,398,253
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 140,326
Total (Not to exceed 275.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,538,579
Section 9.135. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Farmington Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$26,908,986
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ..............................................................517,386
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,745

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 11
Total (Not to exceed 545.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$27,569,117
Section 9.140. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Potosi Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$16,808,331
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................48,076
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 146,945
Total (Not to exceed 328.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$17,003,352
Section 9.145. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Fulton Reception and Diagnostic Center, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,121,626
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,509
Total (Not to exceed 381.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$19,264,135
Section 9.150. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Tipton Correctional Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$13,061,775
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................46,495
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 140,663
Total (Not to exceed 262.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$13,248,933
Section 9.155. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Western Reception, Diagnostic and Correctional Center at St.
Joseph, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 12
institutions and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$24,219,840
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 141,315
Total (Not to exceed 486.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$24,361,155
Section 9.160. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Maryville Treatment Center, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between institutions and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$9,346,471
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 88,929
Total (Not to exceed 186.58 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$9,435,400
Section 9.165. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Crossroads Correctional Center at Cameron, provided ten percent
(10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and three
percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to Section
9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$21,134,179
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................48,544
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 149,455
Total (Not to exceed 422.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$21,332,178
Section 9.170. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Northeast Correctional Center at Bowling Green, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$23,992,019
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 136,150
Total (Not to exceed 508.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$24,128,169

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 13
Section 9.175. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Eastern Reception, Diagnostic, and Correctional Center at Bonne
Terre, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
institutions and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$28,870,743
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................48,076
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 142,926
Total (Not to exceed 576.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$29,061,745
Section 9.180. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the South Central Correctional Center at Licking, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$21,228,327
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................96,157
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 141,072
Total (Not to exceed 419.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$21,465,556
Section 9.185. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Adult Institutions
For the Southeast Correctional Center at Charleston, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between institutions and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$19,759,224
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) ................................................................96,158
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 146,913
Total (Not to exceed 398.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$20,002,295
Section 9.190. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 14
expense and equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,694,218
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 49,379
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 40.15 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,743,597
Section 9.195. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For contractual services for offender physical and mental health care,
provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .....................................................................$203,197,223
For a pilot program to ensure the availability and use of all medication
assisted treatment products approved by the FDA to treat opioid
use disorder, including but not limited to those specified in
Section 191.1165, RSMo, in conjunction with treatment for
incarcerated offenders
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) .......................... 7,900,000
Total .......................................................................................................................$211,097,223
Section 9.200. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For substance use and recovery services, provided one hundred percent
(100%) flexibility is allowed between personal service and
expense and equipment, and ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is
allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,393,612
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 8,571,126
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,964,738
Expense and Equipment
From Opioid Addiction Treatment and Recovery Fund (1705) ..................................1,907,086
From Correctional Substance Abuse Earnings Fund (1853) ............................... 40,000
Total (Not to exceed 49.00 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$12,911,824

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 15
Section 9.205. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For toxicology testing, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed
between sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed
from this section to Section 9.285
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$787,330
Section 9.210. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For offender education, provided one hundred percent (100%) flexibility
is allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$10,122,079
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 650,001
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................10,772,080
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ...................................................................... 1,600,000
Total (Not to exceed 199.00 F.T.E.) ........................................................................$12,372,080
Section 9.215. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Offender Rehabilitative Services
For Missouri Correctional Enterprises, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment
Personal Service .............................................................................................$7,366,762
Expense and Equipment (including $6,000,000 one-time) ...................... 25,300,604
From Working Capital Revolving Fund (1510) (Not to exceed 163.88
F.T.E.) ..........................................................................................................$32,667,366
Section 9.220. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 16
Personal Service ...........................................................................................$87,620,042
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,353,808
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................91,973,850
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ............................................................................................4,336,924
For transfers and refunds set-off against debts as required by Section
143.786, RSMo
From Debt Offset Escrow Fund (1753) ............................................................... 3,600,000
Total (Not to exceed 1,691.31 F.T.E.) .....................................................................$99,910,774
Section 9.225. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For the Transition Center of St. Louis, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 104.36 F.T.E.) ........................$5,090,392
Section 9.230. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For the Transition Center of Kansas City, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between sections and three percent (3%)
flexibility is allowed from this section to Section 9.285
Personal Service
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$4,946,907
From Inmate Fund (1540) .................................................................................... 64,592
Total (Not to exceed 101.18 F.T.E.) ..........................................................................$5,011,499
Section 9.235. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For the Command Center, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service ................................................................................................$757,428
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 4,900
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 16.40 F.T.E.) .............................$762,328

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 17
Section 9.240. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For low-risk offender supervision, provided fifteen percent (15%)
flexibility is allowed between Sections 9.240 and 9.245
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ..........................................................................................$1,700,000
Section 9.245. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For electronic monitoring, provided fifteen percent (15%) flexibility is
allowed between Sections 9.240 and 9.245
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Fund (1540) ..........................................................................................$3,080,289
Section 9.250. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For community supervision centers, provided ten percent (10%)
flexibility is allowed between personal service and expense and
equipment, ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between
sections, and three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this
section to Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$6,508,365
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 557,304
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 128.42 F.T.E.) ..........................7,065,669
For the planning, design, maintenance, demolition, land acquisition, and
construction of a new Community Supervision Center in any
county with more than nineteen thousand but fewer than twenty-
two thousand inhabitants and with a county seat with more than
six thousand but fewer than eight thousand five hundred
inhabitants
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (one-time) .................................................. 8,000,000
Total .........................................................................................................................$15,065,669
Section 9.255. To the Department of Corrections
For the Division of Probation and Parole
For Parole Board operations, provided ten percent (10%) flexibility is
allowed between personal service and expense and equipment,
ten percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between sections, and

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 18
three percent (3%) flexibility is allowed from this section to
Section 9.285
Personal Service .............................................................................................$2,407,654
Annual salary adjustment in accordance with Section 105.005,
RSMo ....................................................................................................................40,563
Expense and Equipment ........................................................................... 86,205
From General Revenue Fund (1101) (Not to exceed 36.00 F.T.E.) ..........................$2,534,422
Section 9.260. To the Department of Corrections
For paying an amount in aid to the counties that is the net amount of costs
in criminal cases, transportation of convicted criminals to the
state penitentiaries, housing, costs for reimbursement of the
expenses associated with extradition, less the amount of unpaid
city or county liability to furnish public defender office space and
utility services pursuant to Section 600.040, RSMo, provided ten
percent (10%) flexibility is allowed between reimbursements to
county jails, certificates of delivery, and extradition payments
For Reimbursements to County Jails at the rate of $24.95 per prisoner
per day ..........................................................................................................$49,956,868
For Certificates of Delivery .........................................................................................1,960,000
For Extradition Payments ............................................................................................1,960,000
For the payment of arrearages .............................................................................. 1,750,676
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................$55,627,544
Section 9.265. To the Department of Corrections
For payments to counties and cities that operate jails or detention
facilities eligible for reimbursement under Section 221.105,
RSMo, for the provision of appropriate feminine hygiene
products to prisoners. Funds shall be distributed by the
department in one annual payment to each county/city based on
each county’s/city’s percent of the total population in eligible
counties/cities as determined by the most recent census
From General Revenue Fund (1101) ............................................................................$240,000
Section 9.270. To the Department of Corrections
For costs associated with offender communication security measures.
Capability shall include continuous monitoring and
investigations of offender communications using an AI-powered
platform to transcribe, analyze, and monitor inmate phone

CCS SS SCS HCS HB 9 19
communications and shall allow corrections personnel to search
transcripts by keywords, names, dates, and phone numbers while
supporting total data ingestion and near real-time processing for
high volumes of communications
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$8,000,000
Section 9.275. To the Department of Corrections
For operating department institutional canteens for offender use and
benefit. Per Section 217.195, RSMo, fund expenditures are solely
to improve offender recreational, religious, or educational
services, and for canteen cash flow and operating expenses
Expense and Equipment
From Inmate Canteen Fund (1405) ..........................................................................$29,813,549
Section 9.280. To the Department of Corrections
For the costs of settlement and other expenses related to resolution of the
Hootselle, et al. v. Missouri Department of Corrections, Case No.
12AC-CC00518-01
Expense and Equipment
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .........................................................................$1,732,650
Section 9.285. To the Department of Corrections
Funds are to be transferred out of the State Treasury to the State
Legal Expense Fund for the payment of claims, premiums, and
expenses as provided by Section 105.711 through 105.726,
RSMo
From General Revenue Fund (1101) .......................................................................................$1
Bill Totals
General Revenue Fund (10,049.85 F.T.E.) ............................................................$951,564,781
Federal Funds (43.00 F.T.E.) .......................................................................................6,214,441
Other Funds (251.88 F.T.E.) ................................................................................ 93,434,119
Total (10,344.73 F.T.E.) .....................................................................................$1,051,213,341
